Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. General Provisions.

Collateral references. —

Rescission of vote authorizing school district expenditure or tax. 68 ALR2d 1041.

Exemption of public school property from assessments for local improvements. 15 ALR3d 847.

Garage or parking lot as within tax exemption extended to property of educational, charitable or hospital organizations. 33 ALR3d 938.

Validity of basing public school financing system on local property taxes. 41 ALR3d 1220.

Exemption of charitable or educational organization from sales or use taxes. 53 ALR3d 748.

Property of educational body tax exempted extending to property used by personnel as living quarters. 55 ALR3d 485.

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities. 95 ALR3d 1000.

What are educational institutions or schools within state property tax exemption provisions. 34 ALR4th 698.

Sec. 14.17.900.
Construction and implementation of chapter.

This chapter does not create a debt of the state. Each district shall establish, maintain, and operate under a balanced budget. The state is not responsible for the debts of a school district.

Money to carry out the provisions of this chapter may be appropriated annually by the legislature into the public education fund. If the amount appropriated to the fund for the purposes of this chapter is insufficient to meet the allocations authorized under AS

14.17.400

—

14.17.470

for a fiscal year, state aid shall be reduced according to AS

14.17.400(b)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 4 SLA 2005)

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and application of state constitutional and statutory balanced budget provisions, 82 ALR6th 497.

Sec. 14.17.905.
Facilities constituting a school.

For purposes of this chapter, the determination of the number of schools in a district is subject to the following:

a community with an ADM of at least 10, but not more than 100, shall be counted as one school;

a community with an ADM of at least 101, but not more than 425, shall be counted as

one elementary school, which includes those students in grades kindergarten through six; and

one secondary school, which includes students in grades seven through 12;

in a community with an ADM of greater than 425, each facility that is administered as a separate school shall be counted as one school, except that each alternative school with an ADM of less than 175 shall be counted as a part of the school in the district with the highest ADM.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section and for purposes other than calculations under AS

14.17.450

, a charter school shall be counted as a separate school if the charter school has an ADM of at least 150 students.

Notwithstanding (a)(2) and (a)(3) of this section, in a community with an ADM of greater than 425 that has only one facility administered as a school for students in grades kindergarten through 12, the number of schools for the community shall be counted under (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 70 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 9 SLA 2009; am § 2 ch 82 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 11, 2018, added (c).

Sec. 14.17.910.
Restrictions governing receipt and expenditure of district money.

Each district shall maintain complete financial records of the receipt and disbursement of state aid, money acquired from local effort, and other money received or held by the district. The records must be in the form required by the department and are subject to audit by the department at a time and place designated by the department.

State aid provided under this chapter is for general operational purposes of the district. All district money, including state aid, shall be received, held, allocated, and expended by the district under applicable local law and state and federal constitutional provisions, statutes, and regulations, including those related to ethical standards and accounting principles.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For school operating fund, see 4 AAC 9, art. 2.

Sec. 14.17.920.
Regulations.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For local education, see 4 AAC 5.

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

For school operating fund, see 4 AAC 9, art. 2.

For review and appeals of actions and decisions regarding funding, see 4 AAC 40.

Sec. 14.17.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise,

“ADM or average daily membership” means the aggregate number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in a school district during the student count period for which a determination is being made, divided by the actual number of days that school is in session for the student count period for which the determination is being made;

“district” means a city or borough school district or a regional educational attendance area;

“district adjusted ADM” means the number resulting from the calculations under AS

14.17.410(b)(1)

;

“district ADM” means the sum of the ADMs in a district;

“eligible federal impact aid” means the amount of federal impact aid received by a district as of March 1 of the fiscal year as a result of an application submitted in the preceding fiscal year, including advance payments and adjustments received since March 1 of the preceding fiscal year from prior year applications, under 20 U.S.C. 7701 — 7714, except payments received under former 20 U.S.C. 7703(f)(2)(B), to the extent the state may consider that aid as local resources under federal law;

“local contribution” means appropriations and the value of in-kind services made by a district;

“taxable real and personal property” means all real and personal property taxable under the laws of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 16 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (5), added “former” preceding “20 U.S.C. 7703(f)(2)(B)”.